Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.020

Practice of court reporting defined.

The "practice of court reporting" means the making by means of written symbols or abbreviations in shorthand or machine writing or oral recording by a stenomask reporter of a verbatim record of any oral court proceeding, deposition, or proceeding before a jury, referee, court commissioner, special master, governmental entity, or administrative agency and the producing of a transcript from the proceeding.

[ 1995 c 27 s 3; 1989 c 382 s 3.]